Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2719
Assessments made by associations of other states; effect.

Assessments made by the insurance guaranty associations, or similar entities, pursuant to the laws of any other state shall not be considered taxes, licenses, other fees, other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions as defined in section 44-150.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 19.